Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 SF 594 (4) 91 ll/js/mb S.F. 594 Section 1. STATE FIRE MARSHAL ââ COUNTYWIDE FIRE PROTECTION 1 SERVICES STUDY. 2 1. The state fire marshal shall conduct a study of fire 3 protection services in this state to analyze whether a 4 structure of countywide fire protection services would maximize 5 fire protection coverage and emergency response times. The 6 study shall be conducted in consultation with representatives 7 from the following stakeholders: 8 a. The department of homeland security and emergency 9 management. 10 b. The Iowa association of professional fire chiefs. 11 c. The Iowa fire chiefsâ association. 12 d. The Iowa firefighters association. 13 e. The Iowa professional fire fighters. 14 f. The Iowa emergency management association. 15 g. At least one attorney licensed to practice law in this 16 state with experience representing entities associated with 17 fire protection services. 18 h. At least one representative from a city having a 19 population of thirty-seven thousand or more as determined by 20 the 2020 federal decennial census. 21 i. At least one representative from a city having a 22 population of less than five thousand as determined by the 2020 23 federal decennial census. 24 j. At least one representative from a county having a 25 population of ninety thousand or more as determined by the 2020 26 federal decennial census. 27 k. Four members of the general assembly serving as 28 ex officio, nonvoting members, one representative to be 29 appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one 30 representative to be appointed by the minority leader of the 31 house of representatives, one senator to be appointed by the 32 president of the senate after consultation with the majority 33 leader of the senate, and one senator to be appointed by the 34 minority leader of the senate. 35 -1- SF 594 (4) 91 ll/js/mb 1/ 3 S.F. 594 2. The countywide fire protection services study shall 1 include all of the following: 2 a. A cost analysis for upfront and ongoing costs to provide 3 consolidated countywide fire protection services systems. The 4 analysis and recommendations shall include proposed funding 5 mechanisms and potential consolidated funding resources that 6 comply with local, state, and federal law. The analysis shall 7 also include the potential effects countywide fire protection 8 services could have on local authority expenditures and 9 budgets. 10 b. An analysis of current fire protection coverage 11 including current response times and recommendations for 12 placement of service stations to maximize fire protection 13 coverage and emergency response times in the most efficient and 14 cost-effective manner. 15 c. An analysis of current and future staffing needs 16 including a proposed employment structure for countywide 17 fire protection services that focuses on adequate employee 18 pay and volunteer staffing, including benefits, stipends, or 19 other compensation allowed in accordance with local, state, or 20 federal law. 21 d. An analysis of current fire protection services 22 equipment and future fire protection services equipment needs 23 including proposed placement of fire protection services 24 equipment in service stations to maximize fire protection 25 coverage and emergency response times. 26 e. An analysis of current communication and dispatch 27 challenges including proposed recommendations for more 28 efficient and effective communications. 29 f. An analysis of the need for city and township fire 30 protection services in relation to the implementation of a 31 countywide fire protection service. 32 g. An analysis of existing countywide fire protection 33 service programs in this state including outlining current 34 processes and procedures. The analysis under this paragraph 35 -2- SF 594 (4) 91 ll/js/mb 2/ 3 S.F. 594 must include outlines of any current or proposed fire 1 protection service programs under chapter 28E, 357B, 357F, 2 357G, or 357J, and any other legal agreement, contract, or 3 consolidated effort, including as part of a district. 4 h. An analysis of countywide fire protection services in 5 other states, with an emphasis on midwest states, including an 6 analysis of those fire protection programs in comparison to the 7 fire protection needs of this state. 8 i. Recommendations for the implementation of countywide 9 fire protection services in this state including proposed 10 functionality and an emphasis on the potential impact of 11 implementation on the four most populous counties in this 12 state as determined by the 2020 federal decennial census, 13 along with surrounding counties if a multicounty approach to 14 fire protection services would be more beneficial based on the 15 studyâs findings. 16 3. The state fire marshal shall submit a report of the 17 studyâs findings to the general assembly on or before June 30, 18 2026. 19 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 20 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 21 -3- SF 594 (4) 91 ll/js/mb 3/ 3